Alabama, session 2026rs, HB429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) OPERATE. To act as the individual in direct and
immediate control of an unmanned aircraft system, regardless
of the method of control.
(2) TICKETED ENTERTAINMENT EVENT. Any music, sporting,
or performing arts event held in a location with gated entries
or barriers that prevent access to the general public and in
which a revocable license that has been issued by an owner,
operator, or lessee of the property is required for an
individual to attend the event.
(3) UNMANNED AIRCRAFT SYSTEM. As defined in Section
13A-7-4.3, Code of Alabama 1975.
(b)(1) It shall be unlawful to operate an unmanned
aircraft system within 400 feet of or above a ticketed
entertainment event.
(2) A violation of this subsection is punishable by a
fine of up to five hundred dollars ($500).
(3) A second or subsequent violation of this subsection
is a Class A misdemeanor.
Page 1

is a Class A misdemeanor.
HB429 Enrolled
(c) Subsection (b) shall not apply to an operator of an
unmanned aircraft system in any of the following scenarios:
(1) The operator has obtained consent by any person
with legal authority over the ticketed entertainment event.
(2) The operator is authorized by federal regulations
to operate an unmanned aircraft system and is operating the
system in a lawful manner consistent with federal regulations.
(3) The operator is an employee of the property where
the event is being held and is conducting official business.
(4) The operator is an employee of a utility service
provider and is conducting official business.
(5) The operator is an owner of private property who is
operating an unmanned aircraft system that he or she owns
above the private property, where the operation is consistent
with federal regulations and is not done for commercial
purposes, to convey or communicate a message, or to record for
the purposes of commercial broadcasting, commercial
publication, monitoring, or to otherwise interfere with a
ticketed entertainment event.
(6) The operator is an employee or volunteer with a
state agency, law enforcement agency, fire department, or
emergency management agency and is conducting official
business.
(7) The ticketed entertainment event is a middle school
or high school sports event.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB429 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 24-Feb-26, as amended.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 10-Mar-26 Amended and Passed

House 12-Mar-26 Concurred in Senate
Amendment


Page 3